Hawaii statutes.
[§428-1005.5] Change of name by foreign
limited liability company. (a) Whenever the name of a foreign limited
liability company that is authorized to transact business in this State is
changed by an amendment to its articles of organization, the foreign limited
liability company, within sixty days after the amendment becomes effective,
shall deliver to the department director a certificate evidencing the name
change that is duly authenticated by the proper officer of the state or country
under the laws of which it is organized. If the certificate is in a foreign
language, a translation attested to under oath by the translator shall
accompany the certificate.

(b) Whenever a foreign limited liability
company that is authorized to transact business in this State changes its name
to one that is substantially identical to the name of any business entity or
trade name registered in this State, the foreign limited liability company
shall not thereafter transact any business in this State until it has changed its
name to a name that is available to it under the laws of this State or has
otherwise complied with this chapter.

(c) If a foreign limited liability company is
unable to change its name to a name that is available to it under the laws of
this State, it may deliver to the director a copy of a certificate of
registration of a different name as a trade name and thereafter shall become
authorized to transact business in this State under that name. [L 2003, c 124,
§3]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next